Massachusetts, session 194th, H2297.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 38B the
following section:-
Section 38B½.(a) For the purposes of this section, an unfunded mandate to a city or town
is one that imposes a cost on municipal governments as a result of legislation being considered
by the General Court, including, but not limited to the cost for the requisite staff necessary to
administer or implement the legislation.
(b) Joint committees of the general court and the committees on ways and means of
either branch thereof when referred bills that contain an unfunded mandate to municipalities
of 2

shall, prior to a favorable report of such bill include a fiscal note or study which clearly explains
any cost described in subsection (a).
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in the event that there is a
cost to any city or town regarding such legislation, the general court shall refrain from enacting
the legislation until such time as an appropriation satisfying said cost is provided by the general
court.
of 2